Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4731
Governor; gifts, grants, and donations; accept.

The Governor may accept gifts, grants, and donations of money, personal property, and real property for use in expanding and improving services to deaf or hard of hearing persons of this state.

Laws 1979, LB 101, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 23.